Utah statutes.
17B-1-625.   Transfer of balances in special funds.

If the necessity for maintaining any special fund of a district ceases to exist and a balance remains in the fund, the board of trustees shall authorize the transfer of the balance to the fund balance in the general fund of the district, subject to the following:

(1)  Any balance remaining in a special assessment fund and not required in its guaranty fund shall be treated in the manner provided in Sections 11-42-413 and 11-42-701.

(2)  Any balance remaining in a capital projects fund shall be transferred to the appropriate debt service fund or other fund as the bond covenants may require and otherwise to the fund balance account in the general fund.

(3)  If any balance held in a trust fund for a specific purpose, other than a cemetery perpetual care trust fund, is to be transferred because its original purpose or restriction has ceased to exist, a public hearing shall be held in the manner provided in Sections 17B-1-609 and 17B-1-610. The published notice shall invite those persons who contributed to the fund to appear at the hearing.  If the board of trustees determines the fund balance amounts are refundable to the original contributors, a 30-day period following the hearing shall be allowed for persons having an interest in the fund to file with the board of trustees a verified claim only for the amount of each claimant's contributions.  Any claim not so filed shall be barred.  Any balance remaining, after refunds to eligible contributors, shall be transferred to the fund balance account in the general fund of the district.

(4)  If the board of trustees decides, in conformity with applicable laws, that the need for continuing maintenance of its cemetery perpetual care trust fund no longer exists, it may transfer the balance in the fund to the capital projects fund for expenditure for land, buildings, and major improvements to be used exclusively for cemetery purposes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

